Arkansas, session 2025, HB1170.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Rate review for Substance Abuse Treatment
and Prevention Block Grant.
(a)(1) The Department of Human Services shall conduct a reimbursement
rate review for the services provided under the Substance Abuse Treatment and
Prevention Block Grant to determine if the reimbursement rates are adequate.
(2) The reimbursement rate review shall include an analysis of
every cost component of providing each service as the basis for determining
the adequacy of the reimbursement rates.
(b) On or before December 31, 2025, the department shall report on the
progress and findings of the reimbursement rate review to:
(1) The Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor;
and
(2) The House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor.

*JMB122*
01/16/2025 1:26:58 PM JMB122